Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,249
Equine activities; legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes that persons who participate in equine activities may incur injuries as a result of the risks involved in such activities. The Legislature also finds that the state and its citizens derive numerous economic and personal benefits from such activities. It is, therefor, the intent of the Legislature to encourage equine activities by providing reasonable standards for those involved in such activities.

Laws 1997, LB 153, § 1.